Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 29.1 Re-Use of Syringes

21-29.1-1.
Re-use of syringes prohibited.

All facilities or persons legally entitled to use disposable syringes and needles including, but not limited to, hospitals and physicians, shall destroy them after one use. Any violation of the provisions of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 194, § 1.